RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.aff
SFX Q džias   dėlesniuosius   džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniaisiais  džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniuosiuose džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesnioji      džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniosios    džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniajai     džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniąją      džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniąja      džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniojoj     džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniojoje    džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniosioms   džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniąsias    džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniosiomis  džias     
SFX Q džias   dėlesniosiose   džias     
SFX Q us      ėlesnis         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnio         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniam        us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnį          us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniu         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniame       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesni          us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnių         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniems       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnius        us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniais       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniuose      us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnė          us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnės         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnei         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnę          us        
SFX Q us      ėlesne          us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnioje       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnėms        us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnes         us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnėmis       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnėse        us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnysis       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniojo       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniajam      us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnįjį        us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniuoju      us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniajame     us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnieji       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniųjų       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniesiems    us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniuosius    us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniaisiais   us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniuosiuose  us        
SFX Q us      ėlesnioji       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniosios     us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniajai      us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniąją       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniąja       us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniojoj      us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniojoje     us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniosioms    us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniąsias     us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniosiomis   us        
SFX Q us      ėlesniosiose    us        
SFX Q is      iausio          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiam         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausį           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiu          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiame        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausių          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiems        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausius         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiais        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuose       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausia          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausios         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiai         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausią          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioje        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioms        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausias         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiomis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiose        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiasis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojo        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajam       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąjį        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuoju       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajame      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausieji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiųjų        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiesiems     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosius     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiaisiais    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosiuose   [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosios      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajai       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąją        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąja        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoj       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoje      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosioms     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąsias      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiomis    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiose     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q ys      iausio          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiam         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausį           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiu          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiame        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausių          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiems        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausius         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiais        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuose       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausia          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausios         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiai         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausią          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioje        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioms        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausias         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiomis       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiose        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiasis       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojo        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajam       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiąjį        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuoju       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajame      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausieji        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiųjų        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiesiems     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuosius     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiaisiais    [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuosiuose   [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioji        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosios      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiajai       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiąją        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiąja        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojoj       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiojoje      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosioms     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiąsias      [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosiomis    [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiosiose     [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q as      iausio          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiam         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausią          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiu          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiame        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausių          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiems        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausius         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiais        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuose       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausia          [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausios         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiai         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioje        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioms        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausias         [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiomis       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiose        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiasis       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojo        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajam       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiąjį        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuoju       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajame      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausieji        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiųjų        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiesiems     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuosius     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiaisiais    [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiuosiuose   [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausioji        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosios      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiajai       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiąją        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiąja        [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojoj       [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiojoje      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosioms     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiąsias      [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosiomis    [^dtij]as 
SFX Q as      iausiosiose     [^dtij]as 
SFX Q us      iausio          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiam         [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausią          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiu          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiame        [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausi           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausių          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iausiems        [^dtj]us  
