RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
abuojas/ANQ
aikļæ½tus/ANQ
akiniuotas/ANQ
akmeningas/ANQ
akuotuotas/ANQ
alkus/ANQ
ambicingas/ANQ
anglinas/ANQ
ankstyvas/ANQ
antiislamiļæ½kas/ANQ
apdairus/ANQ
apgrabus/ANQ
apmaudingas/ANQ
aptakus/ANQ
arļæ½iausias/AQ
aļæ½akotas/ANQ
asociatyvus/ANQ
ateistiļæ½kas/ANQ
atjautus/ANQ
atlaļæ½us/ANQ
atrankus/ANQ
atskaitingas/ANQ
atvangus/ANQ
audrotas/ANQ
aukļæ½tininkas/ANQ
aviļæ½otas/ANQ
balkļæ½vas/ANQ
balzganas/ANQ
basas/ANQ
bļæ½dingas/ANQ
bļæ½ras/ANQ
betarpiļæ½kas/ANQ
biznas/ANQ
blaļæ½kus/ANQ
bokļæ½tuotas/ANQ
brļæ½kļæ½niuotas/ANQ
bukaprotiļæ½kas/ANQ
ceremoningas/ANQ
ciniļæ½kas/ANQ
dabnus/ANQ
dainiļæ½kas/ANQ
dantytas/ANQ
darningas/ANQ
davatkiļæ½kas/ANQ
deglas/ADNQ
dļæ½mesingas/ANQ
dervuotas/ANQ
destruktyvus/ANQ
didis/ANQ
dilgus/ANQ
disciplinuotas/ANQ
dogmatiļæ½kas/ANQ
dovanas/ANQ
draskus/ANQ
drļæ½btas/ANQ
dryļæ½as/ANQ
drumzlus/ANQ
drļæ½ļæ½ļæ½tas/ANQ
dulksnus/ANQ
duodingas/ANQ
duslus/ANQ
dvejopas/ANQ
dvylas/ANQ
ļæ½drus/ANQ
egzotiļæ½kas/ANQ
ekscentriļæ½kas/ANQ
ekvivalentiļæ½kas/ANQ
emaliuotas/ANQ
epopļæ½jiļæ½kas/ANQ
erļæ½kļæ½tingas/ANQ
eļæ½eringas/ANQ
fatalus/ANQ
flegmatiļæ½kas/ANQ
gaidrus/ANQ
gaiļæ½us/ANQ
galimas/ANQ
ganus/ANQ
gargļæ½dus/ANQ
gatavas/ANQ
geguļæ½ļæ½tas/ANQ
geleļæ½ingas/ANQ
geografiļæ½kas/ANQ
giedras/ANQ
ginkluotas/ANQ
giļæ½us/ANQ
gyvuliļæ½kas/ANQ
glitus/ANQ
gluodnas/ANQ
gotiļæ½kas/ANQ
grakļæ½tus/ANQ
grauzdus/ANQ
gretimas/ANQ
griozdiļæ½kas/ANQ
groteskiļæ½kas/ANQ
gruoblļæ½tas/ANQ
gumbuotas/ANQ
gvaldus/ANQ
ļæ½avus/ANQ
ļæ½geidingas/ANQ
ļæ½kypas/ANQ
ilgas/ANQ
ļæ½manomas/ANQ
individualus/ANQ
ļæ½noringas/ANQ
intymus/ANQ
irzlus/ANQ
iļæ½davikiļæ½kas/ANQ
iļæ½ilgas/ANQ
iļæ½kilnus/ANQ
iļæ½linkas/ANQ
iļæ½praļæ½us/ANQ
ļæ½stabus/ANQ
iļæ½teklus/ANQ
iļæ½virkļæ½ļæ½ias/ANQ
ļæ½takus/ANQ
ļæ½tikimas/ANQ
ļæ½ļæ½ambus/ANQ
yliļæ½kas/ANQ
jaunuoliļæ½kas/ANQ
judrus/ANQ
juokingas/ANQ
juslus/ANQ
kairus/ANQ
kaligrafiļæ½kas/ANQ
kaltas/ADNQ
kampuotas/ANQ
kardinalus/ANQ
kasus/ANQ
keliagubas/ANQ
kerļæ½tingas/ANQ
kibus/ANQ
kirmļæ½lļæ½tas/ANQ
kleidus/ANQ
klusnus/ANQ
kolosalus/ANQ
konstruktyvus/ANQ
krantuotas/ANQ
kriauļæ½ingas/ANQ
krļæ½tiningas/ANQ
kuokļæ½tuotas/ANQ
kvapingas/ANQ
laiļæ½kus/ANQ
lapiļæ½kas/ANQ
lemtas/ANQ
liberalus/ANQ
linksmas/ANQ
lygneļæ½as/ANQ
luomiļæ½kas/ANQ
maldingas/ANQ
marļæ½kiniuotas/ANQ
maļæ½as/ANQ
meksikietiļæ½kas/ANQ
mļæ½singas/ANQ
mielinas/ANQ
minkļæ½tas/ANQ
mokestingas/ANQ
moralus/ANQ
nacionaliļæ½kas/ANQ
naujamadiļæ½kas/ANQ
negeras/ANQ
neleistinas/ANQ
nepakartojamas/ANQ
neļæ½vankus/ANQ
nieļæ½uotas/ANQ
normalus/ANQ
nuogļæ½stingas/ANQ
nuostabus/ANQ
oficialus/ANQ
oļæ½kinga/ANQ
pagiriotas/ANQ
pakabus/ANQ
palaimingas/ANQ
paprastas/ANQ
paļæ½aipus/ANQ
pasyvus/ANQ
pastovus/ANQ
pavaldus/ANQ
paļæ½angus/ANQ
pentinuotas/ANQ
piemeniļæ½kas/ANQ
pilkas/ANQ
pirļæ½tuotas/ANQ
plļæ½ļæ½rus/ANQ
plunksnuotas/ANQ
pradaras/ADNQ
pranarotas/ANQ
praviras/ANQ
prieplaikus/ANQ
priimtinas/ANQ
problematiļæ½kas/ANQ
proziļæ½kas/ANQ
purļæ½kus/ANQ
puveningas/ANQ
raiteliļæ½kas/ANQ
ratuotas/ANQ
reļæ½iuotas/ANQ
reljefingas/ANQ
riebalingas/ANQ
rizikingas/ANQ
rļæ½dingas/ANQ
rļæ½ļæ½kanas/ANQ
sakingas/ANQ
ļæ½altakraujiļæ½kas/ANQ
sargalingas/ANQ
ļæ½aunus/ANQ
savininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
sļæ½klingas/ANQ
sensacingas/ANQ
ļæ½ļæ½toniļæ½kas/ANQ
sidabringas/ANQ
ļæ½iltas/ANQ
ļæ½irmokas/ADNQ
ļæ½ykļæ½tus/ANQ
skarotas/ANQ
skilus/ANQ
skriaudus/ANQ
ļæ½lapokas/ANQ
ļæ½liurļæ½tas/ANQ
smailus/ANQ
smiltļæ½tas/ANQ
ļæ½nekus/ANQ
sopus/ANQ
spiraliļæ½kas/ANQ
spuoguotas/ANQ
staļæ½iokiļæ½kas/ANQ
stenografiļæ½kas/ANQ
strategiļæ½kas/ANQ
sukrus/ANQ
suprantamas/ANQ
svajingas/ANQ
ļæ½ventadieniļæ½kas/ANQ
svirus/ANQ
tamsvas/ANQ
tļæ½sus/ANQ
teisnus/ANQ
terļæ½kus/ANQ
tinkamas/ANQ
tobulas/ANQ
trankus/ANQ
trinytiļæ½kas/ANQ
trļæ½nus/ANQ
tuļæ½tokas/ANQ
ugningas/ANQ
uoduotas/ANQ
urzgus/ANQ
uļæ½lajus/ANQ
vaikuotas/ANQ
valdininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
vamzdiļæ½kas/ANQ
varpiļæ½kas/ANQ
veļæ½as/ANQ
velļæ½ningas/ANQ
veriamas/ANQ
vertikalus/ANQ
vidutiniļæ½kas/ANQ
vienodas/ANQ
vilnļæ½tas/ANQ
virļæ½ininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
vylus/ANQ
vulkaniļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½altiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½emļæ½tas/ANQ
ļæ½ieļæ½ulmngas/ANQ
ļæ½ymļæ½tas/ANQ
ļæ½ulsnus/ANQ
ļæ½virgļæ½dļæ½tas/ANQ
